Washington statutes.
RCW 39.34.055

Public purchase agreements with public benefit nonprofit corporations.

The department of enterprise services may enter into an agreement with a public benefit nonprofit corporation to allow the public benefit nonprofit corporation to participate in state contracts for purchases administered by the department. Such agreement must comply with the requirements of RCW 39.34.030 through 39.34.050. For the purposes of this section "public benefit nonprofit corporation" means a public benefit nonprofit corporation as defined in RCW 24.03A.245 that is receiving local, state, or federal funds either directly or through a public agency other than an Indian tribe or a political subdivision of another state.

[ 2021 c 176 s 5217; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 246; 1994 c 98 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 176: See note following RCW 24.03A.005.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.